District of Columbia statutes.
47-2883.03

Payment as defense to assertion of lien.

In any case in which a property owner or occupant has entered into a contract with a person offering to perform or to arrange for the performance of home improvement work, and such property owner or occupant makes payment for such work to the person offering to perform or arrange for the performance of the same, proof of such payment shall constitute a defense against, and render void, any lien sought to be asserted under the authority of subchapter I of Chapter 3 of Title 40, and § 40-303.01.

Sept. 6, 1960, 74 Stat. 816, Pub. L. 86-715, § 3
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190
1981 Ed., § 2-503.
1973 Ed., § 2-2303.
D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.